Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-160
Compensation court; seal.

The Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court shall have a seal for the authentication of its orders, awards, judgments, summons, subpoenas, and other writs. The seal may be either an engraved or ink stamp seal, and shall bear the words Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court—Official Seal, and shall be judicially noticed.

Laws 1935, c. 57, § 10, p. 191;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-171;

R.S.1943, § 48-160;

Laws 1971, LB 653, § 5;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 91.